South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3563.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: County veterans' affairs officers SECTION 1.    Section 25-11-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 25-11-50.    (A) The secretary shall establish uniform methods and procedures for the performance of service work among the several county officers, maintain contact and close cooperation with such officers, and provide assistance, advice and instructions with respect to changes in law and regulations and administrative procedure in relation to the application of such laws and he may require from time to time reports from such county veterans' affairs officers, reflecting the character and progress of their official duties. (B) The secretary or his designee shall evaluate each county office no more than twice per year to determine the level of service being provided to veterans and to ensure compliance with established uniform methods and procedures. The department shall reevaluate any deficiencies noted no more than six months from the initial inspection. The department may assist a county in creating and executing a corrective action plan by the time of reinspection. The secretary shall report the results of final inspection, in writing, to the legislative delegation and the county administrator of each county within ninety days of the final evaluation. The secretary or his designee shall not have the authority to remove a county officer for any reason. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________